Hawaii statutes.
[§52D-14] Duty and right of finders.
(a) Except as provided in section 261-17.7, all money or property found shall
be reported or delivered by the finder to the chief of police of the county.
When so delivered, it shall be held by the chief of police for forty-five days
or until claimed by some person who establishes title or right of custody
thereto to the satisfaction of the chief of police. If title or right of
custody is established, the money or property shall be delivered to the
claimant by the chief of police.

(b) If no claim is made or no such right is
established within the forty-five days, the money or property shall be returned
to the person who delivered it to the chief of police; provided that if the
person who delivered it to the chief of police fails to claim the money or
property within thirty days after being notified by the chief of police that
the person is entitled to possession, the chief of police shall dispose of the
money or property in accordance with the procedures established in section
52D-10. For the purpose of this section, notice by regular mail to the
person's last known address shall be sufficient. [L 1989, c 136, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next